Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2957
Animal Health and Disease Control Act Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Animal Health and Disease Control Act Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of administrative costs collected and money appropriated or transferred by the Legislature and gifts, grants, costs, or charges received or collected from any source, including federal, state, public, and private sources. The fund shall be used to carry out the Animal Health and Disease Control Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 57.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.